District of Columbia statutes.
24-603

Public health program; delegation of powers by Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish and maintain an effective public health program in the District of Columbia to provide a continuum of appropriate services to intoxicated persons and chronic alcoholics. Such program shall coordinate all District of Columbia services for intoxicated persons and chronic alcoholics and shall include at least the following facilities which shall be available to both males and females:

(1)

One or more detoxification centers, which shall be located within the District of Columbia, which shall have a total capacity of not more than 150 beds, and which shall provide appropriate medical services for intoxicated persons, including initial examination, diagnosis, and classification;

(2)

An inpatient extended care facility which shall have a capacity of not more than 800 beds and which shall provide intensive study, treatment, and rehabilitation of chronic alcoholics. Such facility shall not admit intoxicated persons; and

(3)

Outpatient aftercare facilities which may include clinics, social centers, vocational rehabilitation services, and supportive residential facilities and which shall have a total capacity of not more than 600 beds.

(b)

The Mayor may:

(1)

Establish or designate an agency of the District of Columbia government; and

(2)

Designate any officer or employee of the District of Columbia government to carry out any of his functions, powers, and duties under this subchapter.

History

Aug. 4, 1947, 61 Stat. 744, ch. 472, § 3
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 619, Pub. L. 90-452, § 3(a)
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 18, 44 DCR 1408

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-604, § 24-605, and § 24-606.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-523.
1973 Ed., § 24-523.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.